Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.482

Brief adjudicative proceedings—Applicability.

(1) An agency may use brief adjudicative proceedings if:

(a) The use of those proceedings in the circumstances does not violate any provision of law;

(b) The protection of the public interest does not require the agency to give notice and an opportunity to participate to persons other than the parties;

(c) The matter is entirely within one or more categories for which the agency by rule has adopted this section and RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494; and

(d) The issue and interests involved in the controversy do not warrant use of the procedures of RCW 34.05.413 through 34.05.479.

(2) Brief adjudicative proceedings are not authorized for public assistance and food stamp or benefit programs provided for in Title 74 RCW, including but not limited to public assistance as defined in *RCW 74.04.005(1).

[ 1998 c 79 s 3; 1988 c 288 s 425.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.04.005 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (1) to subsection (11).